Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1185
State government recyclable material, defined.

For purposes of the State Government Recycling Management Act, state government recyclable material shall mean any product or material that has reached the end of its useful life, is obsolete, or is no longer needed by state government and for which there are readily available markets to take the material. State government recyclable material includes, but is not limited to, paper, paperboard, aluminum and other metals, yard waste, glass, tires, oil, and plastics.

Laws 1986, LB 380, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1140.01;

Laws 1990, LB 987, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-1644;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 38.